District of Columbia statutes.
10-1121.13

Area exempted from provisions of subchapter.

This subchapter shall not apply to airspace within the area in the District bounded on the north by G Street Northeast and Northwest, on the south by G Street Southeast and Southwest, on the east by 11th Street Northeast and Southeast, and the west by 3rd Street Southwest and Northwest.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1170, Pub. L. 90-598, § 14
1981 Ed., § 7-1043.
1973 Ed., § 7-953.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 11-138, the “Rental of Public Structures in the Public Space Emergency Act of 1995”, see Mayor’s Order 95-117, September 12, 1995.